src/fst/morphology/stems/numerals.lexc
!kääuʹc-čueʹđåʹhcclo+Num:kääuʹc-#čueʹđ#åʹhcc#l NUM_LO ;
!kääuʹc-čueʹđåʹhcclo-õhtt+Num:kääuʹc-#čueʹđ#åʹhcc#lo#õ^1VOW{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}tt NUM_VAHTT ;
!kääuʹc-čueʹđåʹhcclokueʹhtt+Num:kääuʹc-#čueʹđ#åʹhcclokuâ{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}tt NUM_KUEQHTT ;
!kääuʹc-čueʹđåʹhcclokoumm+Num:kääuʹc-#čueʹđ#åʹhcc#lo#ko^1VOWu{ʹØ}mm NUM_1Â_VUCC ;
!kääuʹc-čueʹđåʹhcclonellj+Num:kääuʹc-#čueʹđ#åʹhcc#lo#nẹ^1VOWllj NUM_NELLJ ;
!kääuʹc-čueʹđåʹhcclovitt+Num:kääuʹc-#čueʹđ#åʹhcc#lo#vi^1VOW{ʹØ}tt NUM_TOLL ;
!kääuʹc-čueʹđåʹhcclokutt+Num:kääuʹc-#čueʹđ#åʹhcc#lo#ku^1VOW{ʹØ}tt NUM_TOLL ;
!kääuʹc-čueʹđåʹhccločiččâm+Num:kääuʹc-#čueʹđ#åʹhcc#lo#čiččâm NUM_AANAR ;
!kääuʹc-čueʹđåʹhcclokääuʹc+Num:kääuʹc-#čueʹđ#åʹhcc#lo#kä^1VOW{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}cc NUM_KAEAEUQC ;
!kääuʹc-čueʹđåʹhccloååuʹc+Num:kääuʹc-#čueʹđ#åʹhcc#lo#åå{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}cc NUM_KAEAEUQC ;
!ååuʹc-čueʹđ+Num:ååuʹc-#čuâ{ʹØ}tt NUM_KUEQLL ;
!ååuʹc-čueʹđõhtt+Num:ååuʹc-#čueʹđ#õ^1VOW{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}tt NUM_VAHTT ;
!ååuʹc-čueʹđkueʹhtt+Num:ååuʹc-#čueʹđ#kuâ{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}tt NUM_KUEQHTT ;
!ååuʹc-čueʹđkoumm+Num:ååuʹc-#čueʹđ#ko^1VOWu{ʹØ}mm NUM_1Â_VUCC ;
!ååuʹc-čueʹđnellj+Num:ååuʹc-#čueʹđ#nẹ^1VOWllj NUM_NELLJ ;
!ååuʹc-čueʹđvitt+Num:ååuʹc-#čueʹđ#vi^1VOW{ʹØ}tt NUM_TOLL ;
!ååuʹc-čueʹđkutt+Num:ååuʹc-#čueʹđ#ku^1VOW{ʹØ}tt NUM_TOLL ;
!ååuʹc-čueʹđčiččâm+Num:ååuʹc-#čueʹđ#čiččâm NUM_AANAR ;
!ååuʹc-čueʹđkääuʹc+Num:ååuʹc-#čueʹđ#kä^1VOW{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}cc NUM_KAEAEUQC ;
!ååuʹc-čueʹđååuʹc+Num:ååuʹc-#čueʹđ#åå{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}cc NUM_KAEAEUQC ;
!ååuʹc-čueʹđlååi+Num:ååuʹc-#čueʹđ#l NUM_LOAOAI ;
!ååuʹc-čueʹđõtmlo+Num:ååuʹc-#čueʹđ#õt#m#l NUM_LO ;
!ååuʹc-čueʹđkuâtmlo+Num:ååuʹc-#čueʹđ#kuât#m#l NUM_LO ;
!ååuʹc-čueʹđkonmlo+Num:ååuʹc-#čueʹđ#kon#m#l NUM_LO ;
!ååuʹc-čueʹđnenjmlo+Num:ååuʹc-#čueʹđ#nenj#m#l NUM_LO ;
!ååuʹc-čueʹđvittmlo+Num:ååuʹc-#čueʹđ#vitt#m#l NUM_LO ;
!ååuʹc-čueʹđkuttmlo+Num:ååuʹc-#čueʹđ#kutt#m#l NUM_LO ;
!ååuʹc-čueʹđčinmlo+Num:ååuʹc-#čueʹđ#čin#m#l NUM_LO ;
!ååuʹc-čueʹđkäcmlo+Num:ååuʹc-#čueʹđ#käc#m#l NUM_LO ;
!ååuʹc-čueʹđåcmlo+Num:ååuʹc-#čueʹđ#åc#m#l NUM_LO ;
!ååuʹc-čueʹđkuâhttlo+Num:ååuʹc-#čueʹđ#kuâhtt#l NUM_LO ;
!ååuʹc-čueʹđkuâhttlo-õhtt+Num:ååuʹc-#čueʹđ#kuâhtt#lo#õ^1VOW{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}tt NUM_VAHTT ;
!ååuʹc-čueʹđkuâhttlokueʹhtt+Num:ååuʹc-#čueʹđ#kuâhttlokuâ{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}tt NUM_KUEQHTT ;
!ååuʹc-čueʹđkuâhttlokoumm+Num:ååuʹc-#čueʹđ#kuâhtt#lo#ko^1VOWu{ʹØ}mm NUM_1Â_VUCC ;
!ååuʹc-čueʹđkuâhttlonellj+Num:ååuʹc-#čueʹđ#kuâhtt#lo#nẹ^1VOWllj NUM_NELLJ ;
!ååuʹc-čueʹđkuâhttlovitt+Num:ååuʹc-#čueʹđ#kuâhtt#lo#vi^1VOW{ʹØ}tt NUM_TOLL ;
!ååuʹc-čueʹđkuâhttlokutt+Num:ååuʹc-#čueʹđ#kuâhtt#lo#ku^1VOW{ʹØ}tt NUM_TOLL ;
!ååuʹc-čueʹđkuâhttločiččâm+Num:ååuʹc-#čueʹđ#kuâhtt#lo#čiččâm NUM_AANAR ;
!ååuʹc-čueʹđkuâhttlokääuʹc+Num:ååuʹc-#čueʹđ#kuâhtt#lo#kä^1VOW{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}cc NUM_KAEAEUQC ;
!ååuʹc-čueʹđkuâhttloååuʹc+Num:ååuʹc-#čueʹđ#kuâhtt#lo#åå{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}cc NUM_KAEAEUQC ;
!ååuʹc-čueʹđkoummlo+Num:ååuʹc-#čueʹđ#koum#m#l NUM_LO ;
!ååuʹc-čueʹđkoummlo-õhtt+Num:ååuʹc-#čueʹđ#koumm#lo#õ^1VOW{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}tt NUM_VAHTT ;
!ååuʹc-čueʹđkoummlokueʹhtt+Num:ååuʹc-#čueʹđ#koummlokuâ{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}tt NUM_KUEQHTT ;
!ååuʹc-čueʹđkoummlokoumm+Num:ååuʹc-#čueʹđ#koumm#lo#ko^1VOWu{ʹØ}mm NUM_1Â_VUCC ;
!ååuʹc-čueʹđkoummlonellj+Num:ååuʹc-#čueʹđ#koumm#lo#nẹ^1VOWllj NUM_NELLJ ;
!ååuʹc-čueʹđkoummlovitt+Num:ååuʹc-#čueʹđ#koumm#lo#vi^1VOW{ʹØ}tt NUM_TOLL ;
!ååuʹc-čueʹđkoummlokutt+Num:ååuʹc-#čueʹđ#koumm#lo#ku^1VOW{ʹØ}tt NUM_TOLL ;
!ååuʹc-čueʹđkoummločiččâm+Num:ååuʹc-#čueʹđ#koumm#lo#čiččâm NUM_AANAR ;
!ååuʹc-čueʹđkoummlokääuʹc+Num:ååuʹc-#čueʹđ#koumm#lo#kä^1VOW{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}cc NUM_KAEAEUQC ;
!ååuʹc-čueʹđkoummloååuʹc+Num:ååuʹc-#čueʹđ#koumm#lo#åå{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}cc NUM_KAEAEUQC ;
!ååuʹc-čueʹđnelljlo+Num:ååuʹc-#čueʹđ#nellj#l NUM_LO ;
!ååuʹc-čueʹđnelljlo-õhtt+Num:ååuʹc-#čueʹđ#nellj#lo#õ^1VOW{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}tt NUM_VAHTT ;
!ååuʹc-čueʹđnelljlokueʹhtt+Num:ååuʹc-#čueʹđ#nelljlokuâ{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}tt NUM_KUEQHTT ;
!ååuʹc-čueʹđnelljlokoumm+Num:ååuʹc-#čueʹđ#nellj#lo#ko^1VOWu{ʹØ}mm NUM_1Â_VUCC ;
!ååuʹc-čueʹđnelljlonellj+Num:ååuʹc-#čueʹđ#nellj#lo#nẹ^1VOWllj NUM_NELLJ ;
!ååuʹc-čueʹđnelljlovitt+Num:ååuʹc-#čueʹđ#nellj#lo#vi^1VOW{ʹØ}tt NUM_TOLL ;
!ååuʹc-čueʹđnelljlokutt+Num:ååuʹc-#čueʹđ#nellj#lo#ku^1VOW{ʹØ}tt NUM_TOLL ;
!ååuʹc-čueʹđnelljločiččâm+Num:ååuʹc-#čueʹđ#nellj#lo#čiččâm NUM_AANAR ;
!ååuʹc-čueʹđnelljlokääuʹc+Num:ååuʹc-#čueʹđ#nellj#lo#kä^1VOW{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}cc NUM_KAEAEUQC ;
!ååuʹc-čueʹđnelljloååuʹc+Num:ååuʹc-#čueʹđ#nellj#lo#åå{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}cc NUM_KAEAEUQC ;
!ååuʹc-čueʹđvittlo+Num:ååuʹc-#čueʹđ#vitt#l NUM_LO ;
!ååuʹc-čueʹđvittlo-õhtt+Num:ååuʹc-#čueʹđ#vitt#lo#õ^1VOW{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}tt NUM_VAHTT ;
!ååuʹc-čueʹđvittlokueʹhtt+Num:ååuʹc-#čueʹđ#vittlokuâ{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}tt NUM_KUEQHTT ;
!ååuʹc-čueʹđvittlokoumm+Num:ååuʹc-#čueʹđ#vitt#lo#ko^1VOWu{ʹØ}mm NUM_1Â_VUCC ;
!ååuʹc-čueʹđvittlonellj+Num:ååuʹc-#čueʹđ#vitt#lo#nẹ^1VOWllj NUM_NELLJ ;
!ååuʹc-čueʹđvittlovitt+Num:ååuʹc-#čueʹđ#vitt#lo#vi^1VOW{ʹØ}tt NUM_TOLL ;
!ååuʹc-čueʹđvittlokutt+Num:ååuʹc-#čueʹđ#vitt#lo#ku^1VOW{ʹØ}tt NUM_TOLL ;
!ååuʹc-čueʹđvittločiččâm+Num:ååuʹc-#čueʹđ#vitt#lo#čiččâm NUM_AANAR ;
!ååuʹc-čueʹđvittlokääuʹc+Num:ååuʹc-#čueʹđ#vitt#lo#kä^1VOW{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}cc NUM_KAEAEUQC ;
!ååuʹc-čueʹđvittloååuʹc+Num:ååuʹc-#čueʹđ#vitt#lo#åå{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}cc NUM_KAEAEUQC ;
!ååuʹc-čueʹđkuttlo+Num:ååuʹc-#čueʹđ#kutt#l NUM_LO ;
!ååuʹc-čueʹđkuttlo-õhtt+Num:ååuʹc-#čueʹđ#kutt#lo#õ^1VOW{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}tt NUM_VAHTT ;
!ååuʹc-čueʹđkuttlokueʹhtt+Num:ååuʹc-#čueʹđ#kuttlokuâ{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}tt NUM_KUEQHTT ;
!ååuʹc-čueʹđkuttlokoumm+Num:ååuʹc-#čueʹđ#kutt#lo#ko^1VOWu{ʹØ}mm NUM_1Â_VUCC ;
!ååuʹc-čueʹđkuttlonellj+Num:ååuʹc-#čueʹđ#kutt#lo#nẹ^1VOWllj NUM_NELLJ ;
!ååuʹc-čueʹđkuttlovitt+Num:ååuʹc-#čueʹđ#kutt#lo#vi^1VOW{ʹØ}tt NUM_TOLL ;
!ååuʹc-čueʹđkuttlokutt+Num:ååuʹc-#čueʹđ#kutt#lo#ku^1VOW{ʹØ}tt NUM_TOLL ;
!ååuʹc-čueʹđkuttločiččâm+Num:ååuʹc-#čueʹđ#kutt#lo#čiččâm NUM_AANAR ;
!ååuʹc-čueʹđkuttlokääuʹc+Num:ååuʹc-#čueʹđ#kutt#lo#kä^1VOW{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}cc NUM_KAEAEUQC ;
!ååuʹc-čueʹđkuttloååuʹc+Num:ååuʹc-#čueʹđ#kutt#lo#åå{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}cc NUM_KAEAEUQC ;
!ååuʹc-čueʹđčimlo+Num:ååuʹc-#čueʹđ#či#m#l NUM_LO ;
!ååuʹc-čueʹđčimlo-õhtt+Num:ååuʹc-#čueʹđ#čim#lo#õ^1VOW{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}tt NUM_VAHTT ;
!ååuʹc-čueʹđčimlokueʹhtt+Num:ååuʹc-#čueʹđ#čimlokuâ{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}tt NUM_KUEQHTT ;
!ååuʹc-čueʹđčimlokoumm+Num:ååuʹc-#čueʹđ#čim#lo#ko^1VOWu{ʹØ}mm NUM_1Â_VUCC ;
!ååuʹc-čueʹđčimlonellj+Num:ååuʹc-#čueʹđ#čim#lo#nẹ^1VOWllj NUM_NELLJ ;
!ååuʹc-čueʹđčimlovitt+Num:ååuʹc-#čueʹđ#čim#lo#vi^1VOW{ʹØ}tt NUM_TOLL ;
!ååuʹc-čueʹđčimlokutt+Num:ååuʹc-#čueʹđ#čim#lo#ku^1VOW{ʹØ}tt NUM_TOLL ;
!ååuʹc-čueʹđčimločiččâm+Num:ååuʹc-#čueʹđ#čim#lo#čiččâm NUM_AANAR ;
!ååuʹc-čueʹđčimlokääuʹc+Num:ååuʹc-#čueʹđ#čim#lo#kä^1VOW{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}cc NUM_KAEAEUQC ;
!ååuʹc-čueʹđčimloååuʹc+Num:ååuʹc-#čueʹđ#čim#lo#åå{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}cc NUM_KAEAEUQC ;
!ååuʹc-čueʹđkäʹhcclo+Num:ååuʹc-#čueʹđ#käʹhcc#l NUM_LO ;
!čååuʹc-čueʹđkäʹhcclo-õhtt+Num:ååuʹc-#čueʹđ#käʹhcc#lo#õ^1VOW{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}tt NUM_VAHTT ;
!ååuʹc-čueʹđkäʹhcclokueʹhtt+Num:ååuʹc-#čueʹđ#käʹhcclokuâ{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}tt NUM_KUEQHTT ;
!ååuʹc-čueʹđkäʹhcclokoumm+Num:ååuʹc-#čueʹđ#käʹhcc#lo#ko^1VOWu{ʹØ}mm NUM_1Â_VUCC ;
!ååuʹc-čueʹđkäʹhcclonellj+Num:ååuʹc-#čueʹđ#käʹhcc#lo#nẹ^1VOWllj NUM_NELLJ ;
!ååuʹc-čueʹđkäʹhcclovitt+Num:ååuʹc-#čueʹđ#käʹhcc#lo#vi^1VOW{ʹØ}tt NUM_TOLL ;
!ååuʹc-čueʹđkäʹhcclokutt+Num:ååuʹc-#čueʹđ#käʹhcc#lo#ku^1VOW{ʹØ}tt NUM_TOLL ;
!ååuʹc-čueʹđkäʹhccločiččâm+Num:ååuʹc-#čueʹđ#käʹhcc#lo#čiččâm NUM_AANAR ;
!ååuʹc-čueʹđkäʹhcclokääuʹc+Num:ååuʹc-#čueʹđ#käʹhcc#lo#kä^1VOW{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}cc NUM_KAEAEUQC ;
!ååuʹc-čueʹđkäʹhccloååuʹc+Num:ååuʹc-#čueʹđ#käʹhcc#lo#åå{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}cc NUM_KAEAEUQC ;
!ååuʹc-čueʹđåʹhcclo+Num:ååuʹc-#čueʹđ#åʹhcc#l NUM_LO ;
!ååuʹc-čueʹđåʹhcclo-õhtt+Num:ååuʹc-#čueʹđ#åʹhcc#lo#õ^1VOW{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}tt NUM_VAHTT ;
!ååuʹc-čueʹđåʹhcclokueʹhtt+Num:ååuʹc-#čueʹđ#åʹhcclokuâ{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}tt NUM_KUEQHTT ;
!ååuʹc-čueʹđåʹhcclokoumm+Num:ååuʹc-#čueʹđ#åʹhcc#lo#ko^1VOWu{ʹØ}mm NUM_1Â_VUCC ;
!ååuʹc-čueʹđåʹhcclonellj+Num:ååuʹc-#čueʹđ#åʹhcc#lo#nẹ^1VOWllj NUM_NELLJ ;
!ååuʹc-čueʹđåʹhcclovitt+Num:ååuʹc-#čueʹđ#åʹhcc#lo#vi^1VOW{ʹØ}tt NUM_TOLL ;
!ååuʹc-čueʹđåʹhcclokutt+Num:ååuʹc-#čueʹđ#åʹhcc#lo#ku^1VOW{ʹØ}tt NUM_TOLL ;
!ååuʹc-čueʹđåʹhccločiččâm+Num:ååuʹc-#čueʹđ#åʹhcc#lo#čiččâm NUM_AANAR ;
!ååuʹc-čueʹđåʹhcclokääuʹc+Num:ååuʹc-#čueʹđ#åʹhcc#lo#kä^1VOW{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}cc NUM_KAEAEUQC ;
!ååuʹc-čueʹđåʹhccloååuʹc+Num:ååuʹc-#čueʹđ#åʹhcc#lo#åå{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}cc NUM_KAEAEUQC ;

LEXICON UNDERTHOUSAND
HUNDREDS ;
čueʹtt:čueʹtt HUNDRED ;
čuâđad+A:čuâđ A-ORD_NEELLJAD ;
čueʹtt+Num:čuâ{ʹØ}tt NUM_KUEQLL ;

LEXICON HUNDREDS
kueʹhtt:kueʹhtt CUODI ;
koumm:koumm CUODI ;
nellj:nẹllj CUODI ;
@N.NUMORTH.YES@nellj:@N.NUMORTH.YES@neʹllj CUODI ;
vitt:vitt CUODI ;
kutt:kutt CUODI ;
čiččâm:čiččâm CUODI ;
käʹhcc-:käʹhcc-# CUODI ;
@N.NUMORTH.YES@käʹhcc-:@N.NUMORTH.YES@kääuʹc# CUODI ;
åʹhcc-:åʹhcc-# CUODI ;
@N.NUMORTH.YES@åʹhcc-:@N.NUMORTH.YES@ååuʹc# CUODI ;

LEXICON CUODI
čueʹđ:čueʹđ HUNDRED ;
čuâđ+A:čuâđ A-ORD_NEELLJAD ;
čueʹđ+Num:čuâ{ʹØ}tt NUM_KUEQLL ;

LEXICON HUNDRED
 HUNDREDTENS     ;
 TEENS           ;
 INITIALCARDINAL ;

LEXICON HUNDREDTENS
lååi+Num:#l NUM_LOAOAI ; 
kuâhtt:kuâhtt LÅGEV ;
koumm:koumm LÅGEV ;
@N.NUMORTH.YES@koumm:@N.NUMORTH.YES@kolmm LÅGEV ;
nellj:nẹllj LÅGEV ;
@N.NUMORTH.YES@nellj:@N.NUMORTH.YES@neʹllj LÅGEV ;
vitt:vitt LÅGEV ;
kutt:kutt LÅGEV ;
čim:čim LÅGEV ; ! this one different from TENS
käʹhcc:käʹhcc LÅGEV ;
@N.NUMORTH.YES@käʹhcc:@N.NUMORTH.YES@kääuʹc LÅGEV ;
åʹhcc:åʹhcc LÅGEV ;
@N.NUMORTH.YES@åʹhcc:@N.NUMORTH.YES@ååuʹc LÅGEV ;


LEXICON TENS
lååi+Num:l NUM_LOAOAI ; 
lååǥǥad+A:lååǥǥ A-ORD_NEELLJAD ; 
kuâhtt:kuâhtt   LÅGEV ;
koumm:koumm   LÅGEV ;
@N.NUMORTH.YES@koumm:@N.NUMORTH.YES@kolmm   LÅGEV ;
nellj:nẹllj   LÅGEV ;
@N.NUMORTH.YES@nellj:@N.NUMORTH.YES@neʹllj   LÅGEV ;
vitt:vitt   LÅGEV ;
kutt:kutt   LÅGEV ;
čičm:čičm   LÅGEV ;
@N.NUMORTH.YES@čičm:@N.NUMORTH.YES@čim   LÅGEV ;
käʹhcc:käʹhcc   LÅGEV ;
@N.NUMORTH.YES@käʹhcc:@N.NUMORTH.YES@kääuʹc   LÅGEV ;
åʹhcc:åʹhcc   LÅGEV ;
@N.NUMORTH.YES@åʹhcc:@N.NUMORTH.YES@ååuʹc   LÅGEV ;

LEXICON LÅGEV
lo+Num:#l NUM_LO ;
lo-õhtt+Num:#lo#õ^1VOW{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}tt NUM_VAHTT ;
lo:#lo#   CARDINAL ;!#
lo:#lo#   ORDINAL ;!#
lååǥǥad+A:#lååǥǥ A-ORD_NEELLJAD ;


LEXICON TEENS
õt:õt NUM_LO/NEELLJAD ;
kuât:kuât NUM_LO/NEELLJAD ;
kon:kon NUM_LO/NEELLJAD ;
nenj:nenj NUM_LO/NEELLJAD ;
@N.NUMORTH.YES@nenj:@N.NUMORTH.YES@nẹllj NUM_LO/NEELLJAD ;
@N.NUMORTH.YES@nenj:@N.NUMORTH.YES@neʹllj NUM_LO/NEELLJAD ;
vit:vit  NUM_LO/NEELLJAD ;
@N.NUMORTH.YES@vit:@N.NUMORTH.YES@vitt  NUM_LO/NEELLJAD ;
kut:kut NUM_LO/NEELLJAD ;
@N.NUMORTH.YES@kut:@N.NUMORTH.YES@kutt NUM_LO/NEELLJAD ;
čin:čin NUM_LO/NEELLJAD ;
käc:käc NUM_LO/NEELLJAD ;
åc:åc NUM_LO/NEELLJAD ;

LEXICON NUM_LO/NEELLJAD
mlo+Num:#m#l NUM_LO  ;
mlååǥǥad+A+Ord:#m#lååǥǥ A-ORD_NEELLJAD ;


LEXICON INITIALCARDINAL
õhtt+Num:õ^1VOW{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}tt NUM_VAHTT ;
   CARDINAL ;
   ORDINAL  ;

LEXICON CARDINAL
kueʹhtt+Num:kuâ{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}tt NUM_KUEQHTT ;
koumm+Num:ko^1VOWu{ʹØ}mm NUM_1Â_VUCC ;
nellj+Num:nẹ^1VOWllj NUM_NELLJ ;
vitt+Num:vi^1VOW{ʹØ}tt NUM_TOLL ;
kutt+Num:ku^1VOW{ʹØ}tt NUM_TOLL ;
čiččâm+Num:čiččâm NUM_AANAR ;
käʹhcc+Num:kä^1VOW{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}cc NUM_KAEAEUQC ;
åʹhcc+Num:å^1VOW{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}cc NUM_KAEAEUQC ;

LEXICON ORDINAL
@U.NUMORTH.YES@ ORDINAL-01 ;
@D.NUMORTH.YES@+Err/Orth:@D.NUMORTH.YES@ ORDINAL-01 ;
LEXICON ORDINAL-01

vuõssmõs+A+Ord:vuõsˈsmõ^1VOW{ʹØ}s A_SAJOS ;
vuõss+A+Ord+Use/NG:vuõsˈs ENDLEX ;
nuʹbb+A+Ord:nu^1VOW{ʹØ}bb N_NUQBB ;
kuälmad+A:kuälm  A-ORD_NEELLJAD ;
neelljad+A:neellj  A-ORD_NEELLJAD ;
viiđad+A:viiđ  A-ORD_NEELLJAD ;
kuuđad+A:kuuđ A-ORD_NEELLJAD ;
čiiččad+A:čiičč A-ORD_NEELLJAD ;
kääucad+A:kääuc A-ORD_NEELLJAD ;
ååucad+A:ååuc A-ORD_NEELLJAD ;
